Hawaii statutes.
§507-3 Excess returned to owner. Any
excess over the amount due, and costs of sale and advertising realized from the
sale, shall be paid to the owner of the animals sold. [L 1892, c 9, §3; RL
1925, §2903; RL 1935, §4352; RL 1945, §8753; RL 1955, §193-3; HRS §507-3]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next